Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 56 O.S. 2021, Section 3021, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3021. A. Beginning on January 1, 2011, the Oklahoma 2-
1-1 Advisory Collaborative shall be renamed the 2-1-1 Oklahoma
Coordinating Council. Beginning on July 1, 2021, the 2-1-1 Oklahoma
Coordinating Council shall be renamed the Oklahoma 2-1-1
Collaborative. The Oklahoma 2-1-1 Collaborative is hereby
designated as the state lead entity of all 2-1-1 call centers in
this state that provide hotline services including, but not limited
to, support for food, housing, clothing, transportation, and medical
needs.

B. The Oklahoma 2-1-1 Collaborative, under the administrative
oversight of the Department of Human Services, shall have the
following duties and responsibilities:
1. Develop and maintain Provide recommendations for a statewide
coordinated approach for the promotion of a 2-1-1 system;
2. Develop and maintain Provide recommendations for an
integrated statewide 2-1-1 service that avoids overlap of 2-1-1 call
centers in the state;
3. Certify Verify that information and referral providers who
wish to become 2-1-1 call centers meet applicable national
accreditation standards;
4. Develop and maintain certification standards for providers
that operate as a 2-1-1 call center in the state in compliance with
the Alliance for Information and Referral Systems;
5. Assure that each 2-1-1 call center is accountable and
maintains compliance with Corporation Commission standards;
6. Develop and maintain a process for 2-1-1 call center
accountability and compliance with state and national standards for
any contractual obligations;
7. 5. Provide leadership and coordination for 2-1-1 call
centers as it relates to large-scale emergencies and homeland
security needs;
8. Develop and implement
6. Provide recommendations for a statewide, outcome-driven
strategic plan for 2-1-1 Oklahoma;
9. 7. Advocate for funding to support and sustain 2-1-1 system
delivery;
10. 8. Coordinate with national, state and local partners in
the provision of 2-1-1 services;
11. 9. Collaborate with such entities as may be required and to
the extent required under federal law or to receive federal funding;
ENR. H. B. NO. 4095 Page 2

12. 10. Provide funding formula recommendations to the
administering entity responsible Department of Human Services for
the allocation of direct state and federal funds appropriated for 2-
1-1 Oklahoma; and
13. 11. Submit an annual report no later than September 1 of
each year to the cabinet Secretary for the cabinet area consisting
of the Department of Human Services, of the services rendered in the
past fiscal year by the 2-1-1 system. The report may also include
recommendations of the Oklahoma 2-1-1 Collaborative.
C. 1. The membership of the Oklahoma 2-1-1 Collaborative shall
be comprised of fifteen (15) nine (9) members, five of whom shall be
public sector representatives and ten of whom shall be private
sector representatives. The initial members shall be selected by
the current 2-1-1 call centers in this state as of the effective
date of this act. Vacancies that occur after the selection of the
initial members shall be filled by the Oklahoma 2-1-1 Collaborative
as follows:
a. the Director of Human Services or designee,
b. the Director of the Oklahoma Department of Emergency
Management or designee,
c. the State Commissioner of Health or designee, and
d. six private sector representatives. The Governor, the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker
of the House of Representatives shall each appoint one
such member who resides in the 2-1-1 service area for
western Oklahoma and one such member who resides in
the 2-1-1 service area for eastern Oklahoma.
2. The initial appointments of the private sector
representatives described in subparagraph d of paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall be made as follows:
a. the Governor shall appoint two members to serve
initial terms of one (1) year each,
b. the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint
one member to serve an initial term of two (2) years
and one member to serve an initial term of three (3)
years, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 4095 Page 3

c. the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
appoint one member to serve an initial term of two (2)
years and one member to serve an initial term of three
(3) years.
Thereafter, such members shall serve terms of three (3) years and
may be reappointed. Such members may be removed by their appointing
authorities for cause. Any vacancy shall be filled by the
appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired term.
3. The Oklahoma 2-1-1 Collaborative shall meet not less than
two times per year for the purpose of reviewing and carrying out its
duties and responsibilities.
3. 4. The members of the Oklahoma 2-1-1 Collaborative shall
adopt by-laws governing its operations including terms of office,
the conduct of meetings and such other functions as the Oklahoma 2-
1-1 Collaborative deems necessary to carry out its duties and
responsibilities.
4. 5. Members shall serve without compensation or reimbursement
for expenses; provided, that members who are public officers may be
reimbursed for necessary expenses as provided by law.
D. If federal funding related to 2-1-1 services becomes
available to the state, the state may comply with any requirements
necessary to make application for and receive such federal funding.
E. The Oklahoma 2-1-1 Collaborative shall not have jurisdiction
over any statewide contract or competitively bid contract, and
nothing in this section shall otherwise be construed to apply to any
such contract.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4095 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4095 Page 5